Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-714
Payment out of state; procedure.

When the interest and principal, or interest only, of such registered bonds are payable in New York City, or elsewhere out of the state, payment shall be therein made at the place so designated in such bond or coupon, or at the commercial agency of the state for such purposes. In order that the funds may not be misapplied, the treasurer shall procure a draft for the amount to be transmitted by drawing his check on some bank in this state, and both check and draft shall be so endorsed as to show upon what bond or bonds the funds shall be applied; or, at the request of the party holding or owning said bonds, payment may be made at the office of said treasurer.

Laws 1879, § 16, p. 174;

R.S.1913, § 461;

C.S.1922, § 378;

C.S.1929, § 11-914;

R.S.1943, § 10-714.